Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 50.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-150
Other claims against dissolved limited
liability company.

(ULLCA
704) (a) A dissolved limited liability company shall publish notice of its
dissolution and request persons having claims against the company to present
them in accordance with the notice.

(b) The notice required
by subsection (a) of this section must:

(1) be published three successive weeks in some legal
newspaper of general circulation in the county in this state in which the
dissolved limited liability company's principal office is located or, if it
has none in this state, in the county in which the company's designated office
is or was last located;

(2)
describe the information required to be contained in a claim and provide a
mailing address to which the claim is to be sent; and

(3) state that a claim against the
company is barred unless an action to enforce the claim is commenced within
five years after the publication date of the third required notice.

(c) If a dissolved limited
liability company publishes a notice in accordance with subsection (b) of
this section, unless the claimant commences an action to enforce the claim
against the company within five years after the publication date of the third
required notice, the claim of each of the following claimants is barred:

(1) a claimant that did
not receive notice in a record under section 21-149;

(2) a claimant whose claim was timely
sent to the company but not acted on; and

(3) a claimant whose claim is contingent at, or based
on an event occurring after, the effective date of dissolution.

(d) A claim not barred
under this section may be enforced:

(1) against a dissolved limited liability company,
to the extent of its undistributed assets; and

(2) if assets of the company have
been distributed after dissolution, against a member or transferee to the
extent of that person's proportionate share of the claim or of the assets
distributed to the member or transferee after dissolution, whichever is less,
but a person's total liability for all claims under this subdivision does
not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the person after dissolution.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 50.